src/fst/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
LEXICON Adverbs
    la+Adv+Neg:la       #   "no, not" ;
    lá+Adv+Neg+Emp:lá   #   "no, not" ;

    oio+Adv:oio         #   "ever" ;

    sí+Adv:sí           #   "here, now" ;
    sin+Adv:sin         #   "here, now" ;
    sín+Adv:sín         #   "here, now" ;

    sin+Adv:sin         #   "thus" ;
    ú+Adv:ú             #   "without" ;
